Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1527
Board; bonds; powers.

Each board may do any and all things necessary and convenient to carry out the purposes and intent of sections 85-1515 and 85-1520 to 85-1527.

Laws 1987, LB 329, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 79-2650.15;

Laws 1993, LB 239, § 49.